Hawaii statutes.
[§667-96] Public notice of public sale;
contents; distribution; publication. (a) The association shall prepare
the public notice of the public sale. The public notice shall state:

(1) The date, time, and place of the public
sale;

(2) The unpaid
balance of the moneys owed to the association;

(3) A description
of the unit, including the address and the tax map key number of the unit;

(4) The name of
the unit owner;

(5) The name of
the association;

(6) The name of
any prior or junior creditors having a recorded lien on the unit before the
recordation of the notice of default and intention to foreclose under section
667-93;

(7) The name, the
address in the State, and the telephone number in the State of the person in
the State conducting the public sale; and

(8) The terms and
conditions of the public sale.

(b) The public notice shall also contain
wording substantially similar to the following in all capital letters:

"THE DEFAULT
UNDER THE ASSOCIATION DOCUMENTS MAY BE CURED NO LATER THAN THREE BUSINESS DAYS
BEFORE THE DATE OF THE PUBLIC SALE OF THE UNIT BY PAYING THE ENTIRE AMOUNT THAT
WOULD BE OWED TO THE ASSOCIATION PLUS THE ASSOCIATION'S ATTORNEY'S FEES AND
COSTS, AND ALL OTHER FEES AND COSTS INCURRED BY THE FORECLOSING ASSOCIATION
RELATED TO THE DEFAULT, UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED TO BETWEEN THE ASSOCIATION AND
THE UNIT OWNER. THERE IS NO RIGHT TO CURE THE DEFAULT OR ANY RIGHT OF
REDEMPTION AFTER THAT TIME. IF THE DEFAULT IS SO CURED, THE PUBLIC SALE SHALL
BE CANCELED."

(c) If the default is not cured as required by
the notice of default and intention to foreclose, the association shall have a
copy of the public notice of the public sale of the unit:

(1) Mailed or delivered to the unit owners at their respective last known addresses;

(2) Mailed or delivered to any prior or
junior creditors having a recorded lien on the unit before the recordation of
the notice of default and intention to foreclose under section 667-93;

(3) Mailed or delivered to the state
director of taxation;

(4) Mailed or delivered to the director of
finance of the county where the unit is located;

(5) Posted on the unit or on such other real
property of which the unit is a part; and

(6) Mailed or delivered to any other person
entitled to receive notice under section 667-5.5 or 667-21.5.

(d) The association shall have the public
notice of the public sale:

(1) Printed in not less than seven-point font and published in the classified
section of a newspaper that is published at least weekly and having a general circulation in the county in
which the unit is located. The public notice shall be published once each week
for three consecutive weeks, constituting three publications. The public sale
shall take place no sooner than fourteen days after the date of the publication
of the third public notice advertisement; or

(2) Not less than twenty-eight days before
the date of the public sale, published on a state
website at the discretion of the agency that maintains the website; provided
that the public notice shall be published at least once in the format described
in paragraph (1) at least fourteen days prior to the public sale. [L 2012, c 182, pt of §3(2), §§62, 69(5)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next